Utah statutes.
62A-17-106.   Immunity from liability.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), Utah 211, its employees, directors, officers, and information specialists are not liable to any person in a civil action for injury or loss as a result of an act or omission of Utah 211, its employees, directors, officers, or information specialists, in connection with:

(a)  developing, adopting, implementing, maintaining, or operating the Utah 211 system;

(b)  making Utah 211 available for use by the public; or

(c)  providing 211 services.

(2)  Utah 211, its employees, directors, officers, and information specialists shall be liable to any person in a civil action for an injury or loss resulting from willful or wanton misconduct.



Enacted by Chapter 24, 2013 General Session

